Colorado, session 2026A, SB113.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 27-50-101, add (17.5)
as follows:
27-50-101. Definitions.
As used in this article 50, unless the context otherwise requires:
(17.5) (a) "RECOVERY RESIDENCE" MEANS A LICENSED PREMISES,
PLACE, FACILITY, OR BUILDING THAT PROVIDES HOUSING ACCOMMODATION
FOR INDIVIDUALS WITH A PRIMARY DIAGNOSIS OF A BEHAVIORAL HEALTH
DISORDER AND THAT:
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(I) DOES NOT PERMIT THE POSSESSION OR USE OF ALCOHOL OR
NONPRESCRIBED OR ILLICIT DRUGS;
(II) PROMOTES INDEPENDENT LIVING AND LIFE-SKILL DEVELOPMENT;
AND
(III) PROVIDES STRUCTURED ACTIVITIES AND RECOVERY SUPPORT
SERVICES THAT ARE PRIMARILY INTENDED TO PROMOTE AND SUSTAIN
RECOVERY FROM BEHAVIORAL HEALTH DISORDERS.
(b) "RECOVERY RESIDENCE" DOES NOT INCLUDE:
(I) A PRIVATE RESIDENCE IN WHICH AN INDIVIDUAL RELATED TO THE
OWNER OF THE RESIDENCE BY BLOOD, ADOPTION, OR MARRIAGE IS REQUIRED
TO ABSTAIN FROM SUBSTANCE USE OR RECEIVE BEHAVIORAL HEALTH
SERVICES FOR A BEHAVIORAL HEALTH DISORDER AS A CONDITION OF
RESIDING IN THE RESIDENCE;
(II) A BEHAVIORAL HEALTH ENTITY LICENSED BY THE BHA TO
PROVIDE RESIDENTIAL TREATMENT;
(III) PERMANENT SUPPORTIVE HOUSING. FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS
SUBSECTION (17.5)(b)(III), "PERMANENT SUPPORTIVE HOUSING" MEANS
COMMUNITY-BASED AFFORDABLE HOUSING WHERE EXTREMELY LOW-INCOME
INDIVIDUALS WITH COMPLEX BARRIERS TO HOUSING STABILITY AND
HISTORIES OF HOMELESSNESS HAVE A DEDICATED RENTAL SUBSIDY THAT IS
NOT CONDITIONAL ON PARTICIPATION IN SUPPORTIVE SERVICES AND
INCLUDES THE SAME RIGHTS AND RESPONSIBILITIES OF TENANCY LEGALLY
GUARANTEED BY A LEASE AGREEMENT AND ACCESS TO INTENSIVE
COORDINATED SUPPORTIVE SERVICES DESIGNED TO SUPPORT TENANTS TO
LIVE INDEPENDENTLY WITH IMPROVED HEALTH OUTCOMES AND REDUCED
EMERGENCY SYSTEM UTILIZATION.
(IV) SHELTERS, EMERGENCY OVERFLOW BEDS, BEDS IN SERVICE
PURSUANT TO EMERGENCY PROTOCOLS, ANY OTHER FORM OF TRANSIENT OR
EXIGENT HOUSING THAT HAS AN AVERAGE STAY OF LESS THAN THREE DAYS,
OR HOUSING OPTIONS THAT ARE UNDER THE PRIMARY OVERSIGHT OF THE
DIVISION OF HOUSING IN THE DEPARTMENT OF LOCAL AFFAIRS;
PAGE 2-SENATE BILL 26-113

(V) A HEALTH FACILITY, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 24-33.5-1202; OR
(VI) A COMMUNITY-BASED ORGANIZATION OR PROGRAM THAT HAS
A PRIMARY MISSION OF PROVIDING SUPPORTIVE SERVICES TO INDIVIDUALS
RELEASED FROM JAIL OR PRISON, OR OTHERWISE INVOLVED IN THE CRIMINAL
JUSTICE SYSTEM, AND THAT DOES NOT REQUIRE THE INDIVIDUAL TO HAVE A
PRIMARY BEHAVIORAL HEALTH DISORDER IN ORDER TO RECEIVE SERVICES,
INCLUDING HOUSING.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add part 10 to article
50 of title 27 as follows:
PART 10
RECOVERY RESIDENCES
27-50-1001. Regulation of recovery residences - license -
violations and penalties - rules.
(1) ON AND AFTER JULY 1, 2027, IT IS UNLAWFUL FOR A PERSON TO
CONDUCT OR MAINTAIN A RECOVERY RESIDENCE WITHOUT HAVING
OBTAINED A LICENSE FROM THE BHA.
(2) A PERSON THAT HAS BEEN FOUND TO HAVE VIOLATED
SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION BY A COURT OF COMPETENT JURISDICTION
MAY BE SUBJECT TO A CIVIL PENALTY ASSESSED BY THE BHA OF NOT LESS
THAN FIFTY DOLLARS BUT NOT MORE THAN ONE HUNDRED DOLLARS FOR
EACH DAY THE UNLICENSED RECOVERY RESIDENCE VIOLATED SUBSECTION
(1) OF THIS SECTION. THE ASSESSED PENALTY ACCRUES FROM THE DATE THE
BHA FINDS THAT THE PERSON IS IN VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION. THE BHA
SHALL ASSESS, ENFORCE, AND COLLECT THE PENALTY IN ACCORDANCE WITH
ARTICLE 4 OF TITLE 24 AND CREDIT THE MONEY TO THE GENERAL FUND.
ENFORCEMENT AND COLLECTION OF THE PENALTY OCCURS FOLLOWING THE
DECISION REACHED IN ACCORDANCE WITH PROCEDURES SET FORTH IN
SECTION 24-4-105.
(3) THE BHA SHALL TAKE ACTION ON AN APPLICATION FOR
LICENSURE WITHIN THIRTY DAYS AFTER THE DATE THAT THE BHA RECEIVES
THE COMPLETE APPLICATION.
(4) (a) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2027, A LICENSED, REGISTERED, OR
CERTIFIED HEALTH-CARE PROVIDER; A BEHAVIORAL HEALTH
PAGE 3-SENATE BILL 26-113

ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES ORGANIZATION; A MANAGED CARE ENTITY, AS
DEFINED IN SECTION 25.5-5-802 (5); A MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION, AS
DEFINED IN SECTION 25.5-5-403 (5); A LICENSED HEALTH-CARE FACILITY; OR
A GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY SHALL NOT REFER AN INDIVIDUAL TO A RECOVERY
RESIDENCE OR PURCHASE OR CONTRACT FOR SERVICES FROM A RECOVERY
RESIDENCE UNLESS THE RECOVERY RESIDENCE HAS OBTAINED A LICENSE
FROM THE BEHAVIORAL HEALTH ADMINISTRATION.
(b) (I) A RECOVERY RESIDENCE THAT IS CERTIFIED PURSUANT TO
SECTION 27-80-129 AS OF JUNE 30, 2027, SHALL GIVE NOTICE TO THE BHA
PRIOR TO JULY 1, 2027, IN THE FORM AND MANNER PRESCRIBED BY THE
BHA, THAT THE RECOVERY RESIDENCE:
(A) HOLDS A CERTIFICATION AS OF JUNE 30, 2027;
(B) IS IN COMPLIANCE WITH ALL APPLICABLE RULES FOR OPERATING
A RECOVERY RESIDENCE ADOPTED PURSUANT TO SECTION 27-50-1002; AND
(C) INTENDS TO PURSUE A RECOVERY RESIDENCE LICENSE FROM THE
BHA PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION.
(II) THE CERTIFIED RECOVERY RESIDENCE MAY OPERATE IN THIS
STATE AND RECEIVE REFERRALS. A CERTIFICATION IS IN LIEU OF LICENSURE
UNTIL THE RECOVERY RESIDENCE IS LICENSED.
(c) (I) A CERTIFIED RECOVERY RESIDENCE SHALL SUBMIT AN
APPLICATION FOR LICENSURE TO THE BHA NO LESS THAN SIXTY DAYS PRIOR
TO ONE YEAR AFTER THE DATE THE RECOVERY RESIDENCE'S CERTIFICATION
WAS LAST ISSUED PURSUANT TO SECTION 27-80-129. THE APPLICATION MUST
BE SUBMITTED IN THE FORM AND MANNER PRESCRIBED BY THE BHA
PURSUANT TO SECTION 27-50-1003.
(II) ON AND AFTER JULY 1, 2028, A RECOVERY RESIDENCE
PREVIOUSLY CERTIFIED PURSUANT TO SECTION 27-80-129 SHALL NOT
OPERATE WITHOUT APPLYING AND BEING APPROVED FOR A LICENSE
PURSUANT TO SECTION 27-50-1003.
(d) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2027, A CERTIFIED RECOVERY RESIDENCE
SHALL REPORT THE OCCURRENCES DESCRIBED IN SECTION 27-50-1006 TO
THE BHA. THE REPORTING REQUIREMENTS IN SECTION 27-50-1006
PAGE 4-SENATE BILL 26-113

CONTINUE TO APPLY AFTER THE CERTIFIED RECOVERY RESIDENCE RECEIVES
A LICENSE PURSUANT TO SECTION 27-50-1003.
(e) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2027, THE BHA MAY INSPECT A RECOVERY
RESIDENCE AS IT DEEMS NECESSARY TO ENSURE THE RECOVERY RESIDENTS'
HEALTH, SAFETY, AND WELFARE ARE PROTECTED. THE RECOVERY RESIDENCE
SHALL SUBMIT IN WRITING, IN THE FORM AND MANNER PRESCRIBED BY THE
BHA, A PLAN DETAILING THE MEASURES THAT THE RECOVERY RESIDENCE
WILL TAKE TO CORRECT VIOLATIONS FOUND BY THE BHA AS A RESULT OF
INSPECTIONS CONDUCTED PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (4)(e). THE BHA
MAY TAKE ADDITIONAL ACTIONS IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION
27-50-1005.
(5) (a) A RECOVERY RESIDENCE OWNER, EMPLOYEE, OR MANAGER,
OR AN INDIVIDUAL RELATED TO A RECOVERY RESIDENCE OWNER, EMPLOYEE,
OR MANAGER, SHALL NOT DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY:
(I) SOLICIT, ACCEPT, OR RECEIVE A COMMISSION, PAYMENT, TRADE,
FEE, OR ANYTHING OF MONETARY OR MATERIAL VALUE FOR AN APPLICATION
TO RESIDE IN THE RECOVERY RESIDENCE OR FOR ANY PROCESS TO
DETERMINE WHETHER AN INDIVIDUAL WILL RESIDE IN THE RECOVERY
RESIDENCE; OR
(II) SOLICIT, ACCEPT, OR RECEIVE A COMMISSION, PAYMENT, TRADE,
FEE, OR ANYTHING OF MONETARY OR MATERIAL VALUE FROM A TOXICOLOGY
LABORATORY THAT PROVIDES CONFIRMATION TESTING OR POINT-OF-CARE
TESTING FOR RECOVERY RESIDENTS.
(b) SUBSECTION (5)(a)(I) OF THIS SECTION DOES NOT PREVENT A
RECOVERY RESIDENCE FROM RECEIVING PAYMENT OR FEES:
(I) FOR AN INDIVIDUAL TO RESIDE AND RECEIVE SUPPORTS IN A
RECOVERY RESIDENCE; OR
(II) FOR SUPPORTIVE SERVICES THAT ARE REQUIRED TO PLACE THE
RECOVERY RESIDENT.
(6) (a) A RECOVERY RESIDENCE SHALL NOT DENY ADMISSION TO AN
INDIVIDUAL BASED ON THE INDIVIDUAL'S PARTICIPATION IN PRESCRIBED
MEDICATION-ASSISTED TREATMENT, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 23-21-803, FOR
PAGE 5-SENATE BILL 26-113

A SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER, INCLUDING ANY PRESCRIBED OR DISPENSED
AGONIST TREATMENT THAT IS APPROVED BY THE FEDERAL FOOD AND DRUG
ADMINISTRATION. THE RECOVERY RESIDENCE SHALL NOT REQUIRE AN
INDIVIDUAL TO DISCONTINUE OR TAPER USAGE OF MEDICATION-ASSISTED
TREATMENT AS A CONDITION OF RESIDING IN THE RECOVERY RESIDENCE.
(b) A RECOVERY RESIDENCE SHALL NOT CATEGORICALLY PROHIBIT
A RECOVERY RESIDENT'S ABILITY TO TAKE PRESCRIBED MEDICATIONS,
INCLUDING CONTROLLED MEDICATIONS, IN ACCORDANCE WITH A
PHYSICIAN'S ORDERS. ADMISSION TO, OR CONTINUED RESIDENCE IN, A
RECOVERY RESIDENCE MUST NOT BE CONTINGENT UPON THE CESSATION OF
TAKING PRESCRIBED MEDICATIONS UNLESS THE RECOVERY RESIDENCE
DETERMINES, THROUGH AN INDIVIDUALIZED ASSESSMENT, THAT THE
RECOVERY RESIDENT'S USE OF THE MEDICATION POSES A RISK TO THE SAFETY
OF THE RECOVERY RESIDENTS, OR TO THE RECOVERY ENVIRONMENT, AND
THAT THE RISK CANNOT BE MITIGATED BY REASONABLE ACCOMMODATION.
IN MAKING AN INDIVIDUALIZED DETERMINATION, THE RECOVERY RESIDENCE
SHALL CONSIDER INDIVIDUAL FACTORS FOR THE RECOVERY RESIDENT WHO
IS PRESCRIBED THE MEDICATION THAT MAY MITIGATE OR INCREASE RISK OF
MISUSE OR DIVERSION OF THE PRESCRIBED MEDICATION. THE RECOVERY
RESIDENCE SHALL ESTABLISH POLICIES AND PROCEDURES TO IMPLEMENT
THIS SUBSECTION (6)(b).
(c) A RECOVERY RESIDENCE MAY IMPLEMENT REQUIREMENTS
RELATED TO THE STORAGE AND ADMINISTRATION OF PRESCRIBED
MEDICATIONS AS A MEANS OF ENSURING SAFETY AND PREVENTING
DIVERSION OF MEDICATIONS.
(7) A RECOVERY RESIDENCE THAT IS LICENSED AS A BEHAVIORAL
HEALTH ENTITY TO PROVIDE ONSITE OUTPATIENT SERVICES TO RECOVERY
RESIDENTS MUST BE LICENSED AS A RECOVERY RESIDENCE. THE BHA SHALL
ADOPT RULES TO CREATE STREAMLINED REGULATIONS FOR A RECOVERY
RESIDENCE THAT IS LICENSED AS A BEHAVIORAL HEALTH ENTITY, BUT THE
RULES MUST NOT DUPLICATE OVERSIGHT REGULATIONS FOR A BEHAVIORAL
HEALTH ENTITY THAT IS LICENSED TO PROVIDE ONSITE OUTPATIENT
SERVICES. AT A MINIMUM, THE RULES MUST INCLUDE, BUT ARE NOT LIMITED
TO, RECOVERY RESIDENT RIGHTS, PHYSICAL ENVIRONMENT STANDARDS, AND
INCIDENT REPORTING.
(8) THE BHA SHALL MAINTAIN A PUBLICLY AVAILABLE LIST OF
PAGE 6-SENATE BILL 26-113

LICENSED RECOVERY RESIDENCES.
(9) (a) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF THIS PART 10,
A RECOVERY RESIDENCE THAT IS CHARTERED BY OXFORD HOUSE, INC., OR
ITS SUCCESSOR ORGANIZATION, REFERRED TO IN THIS SUBSECTION (9) AS A
"CHARTERED RECOVERY RESIDENCE", MAY OPERATE IN THIS STATE AND
RECEIVE REFERRALS AND FUNDING PURSUANT TO THIS PART 10 IF THE
CHARTERED RECOVERY RESIDENCE:
(I) OPERATES IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBSECTION (9);
(II) OPERATES IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF HOMES
ESTABLISHED PURSUANT TO 42 U.S.C. SEC. 300X-25; AND
(III) IS DEMOCRATICALLY RUN SHARED HOUSING THAT HAS NO
OPERATOR, MANAGER, PAID STAFF, OR PROVISION OF PROFESSIONAL
TREATMENT OR THERAPY.
(b) NO LATER THAN JULY 1, 2027, OXFORD HOUSE, INC. SHALL
PROVIDE TO THE BHA, IN THE FORM AND MANNER PRESCRIBED BY THE BHA,
A LIST OF ALL CHARTERED RECOVERY RESIDENCES IN THE STATE AS OF THE
DATE OF THE NOTICE.
(c) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2027, OXFORD HOUSE, INC. SHALL NOTIFY
THE BHA IN THE FORM AND MANNER PRESCRIBED BY THE BHA WHEN IT
ISSUES A NEW CHARTER TO OXFORD HOUSE, INC. IN THE STATE.
(d) UPON NOTIFICATION THAT A RECOVERY RESIDENCE IS
CHARTERED BY OXFORD HOUSE, INC. OR ITS SUCCESSOR ORGANIZATION, THE
BHA SHALL ISSUE A RECOVERY RESIDENCE LICENSE TO THE CHARTERED
RECOVERY RESIDENCE.
(e) ON AND AFTER JULY 1, 2027, OXFORD HOUSE, INC. SHALL NOTIFY
THE BHA WITHIN TEN DAYS AFTER CLOSING OR REVOKING A RECOVERY
RESIDENCE'S CHARTER.
(f) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2027, A CHARTERED RECOVERY RESIDENCE
SHALL SUBMIT OCCURRENCE REPORTS TO THE BHA, IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SECTION 27-50-1006 AND IN THE FORM, MANNER, AND TIME FRAME
PRESCRIBED BY BHA.
PAGE 7-SENATE BILL 26-113

(g) A CHARTERED RECOVERY RESIDENCE IS NOT SUBJECT TO AN
INITIAL OR ANNUAL ONSITE LICENSURE SURVEY.
(h) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2027, THE BHA MAY INSPECT A CHARTERED
RECOVERY RESIDENCE IN RESPONSE TO A COMPLAINT OR AN OCCURRENCE
REPORT RECEIVED BY THE BHA AS IT DEEMS NECESSARY TO ENSURE THAT
THE HEALTH, SAFETY, AND WELFARE OF RECOVERY RESIDENTS ARE
PROTECTED, AND THAT THE CHARTERED RECOVERY RESIDENCE IS OPERATING
IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBSECTION (9). THE BHA MAY REQUIRE THAT
OXFORD HOUSE, INC. SUBMIT IN WRITING, IN A FORM PRESCRIBED BY THE
BHA, A PLAN DETAILING THE MEASURES THAT OXFORD HOUSE, INC. WILL
TAKE TO CORRECT VIOLATIONS FOUND BY THE BHA AS A RESULT OF
INSPECTIONS UNDERTAKEN PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (9). THE BHA
MAY TAKE ADDITIONAL ACTIONS IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION
27-50-1005.
27-50-1002. Rules for minimum standards of operation -
criminal history background check for employment or contract for
services.
(1) NO LATER THAN MAY 1, 2027, THE BHA SHALL ADOPT RULES
THAT ESTABLISH THE MINIMUM STANDARDS FOR OPERATING A RECOVERY
RESIDENCE IN THE STATE, WHICH RULES MUST INCLUDE:
(a) REQUIREMENTS THAT MUST BE MET TO ENSURE THE HEALTH,
SAFETY, AND WELFARE OF ALL RECOVERY RESIDENTS, INCLUDING
REQUIREMENTS RELATED TO:
(I) RECOVERY RESIDENT RIGHTS AND CONSUMER NOTICE;
(II) ADMINISTRATIVE AND OPERATIONAL STANDARDS FOR
GOVERNANCE, CONSUMER RECORDS AND RECORD RETENTION, PERSONNEL,
ADMISSION AND DISCHARGE CRITERIA, POLICIES AND PROCEDURES TO
ENSURE COMPLIANCE WITH REGULATORY AND CONTRACT REQUIREMENTS,
QUALITY MANAGEMENT, DISCHARGE AND TRANSFER POLICIES, INDIVIDUAL
RELAPSE AND SAFETY PLANS, AND PROGRAM AGREEMENTS;
(III) DATA REPORTING;
(IV) PHYSICAL RESIDENCE STANDARDS, WHICH INCLUDES OBTAINING
PAGE 8-SENATE BILL 26-113

ALL REQUIRED BUILDING AND SAFETY INSPECTIONS AND PERMITS AND
COMPLIANCE WITH APPLICABLE BUILDING AND PROPERTY MAINTENANCE
CODES THAT ARE ENFORCED BY A LOCAL GOVERNMENT APPLICABLE TO
RESIDENTIAL DWELLINGS OF THE SAME TYPE, SIZE, AND OCCUPANCY
CLASSIFICATION IN THE SAME JURISDICTION.
(V) OCCURRENCE REPORTING PURSUANT TO SECTION 27-50-1006;
(b) OWNER AND MANAGER REQUIREMENTS;
(c) PROCEDURES FOR MANDATORY BHA INSPECTIONS OF RECOVERY
RESIDENCES;
(d) PROCEDURES FOR WRITTEN PLANS FOR A RECOVERY RESIDENCE
TO CORRECT VIOLATIONS IDENTIFIED AS A RESULT OF AN INSPECTION;
(e) INTERMEDIATE ENFORCEMENT REMEDIES, AS DESCRIBED IN
SECTION 27-50-1005 (3); AND
(f) IF A RECOVERY RESIDENCE WAS CERTIFIED TO OPERATE PRIOR TO
JULY 1, 2027, TIMELINES FOR COMPLYING WITH THE RECOVERY RESIDENCE
STANDARDS THAT EXCEED THE STANDARDS UNDER WHICH A RECOVERY
RESIDENCE WAS PREVIOUSLY CERTIFIED.
(2) THIS SECTION DOES NOT EXEMPT A RECOVERY RESIDENCE OR ITS
RESIDENTS OR OPERATORS FROM COMPLYING WITH ANY STATE, COUNTY, OR
MUNICIPAL HEALTH, SAFETY, OR FIRE CODES. A RECOVERY RESIDENCE THAT
OPERATES IN A SINGLE-FAMILY OR MULTI-FAMILY RESIDENTIAL STRUCTURE
IS NOT REQUIRED TO COMPLY WITH COMMERCIAL, INSTITUTIONAL, OR
ASSEMBLY OCCUPANCY STANDARDS SOLELY BY REASON OF ITS LICENSURE
UNDER THIS PART 10, REGARDLESS OF THE JURISDICTION IN WHICH THE
RECOVERY RESIDENCE OPERATES.
(3) ANY RULES OR REGULATIONS ADOPTED PURSUANT TO THIS
SECTION MUST NOT PROHIBIT, OR BE CONSTRUED TO AUTHORIZE THE
PROHIBITION OF, AN INDIVIDUAL FROM RESIDING IN A RECOVERY RESIDENCE
SOLELY ON THE BASIS OF AN INDIVIDUAL'S PRIOR CRIMINAL JUSTICE
INVOLVEMENT OR PAST CRIMINAL CONVICTIONS.
27-50-1003. Applications - investigations - inspections - criminal
PAGE 9-SENATE BILL 26-113

history background checks for owners and managers.
(1) AN APPLICATION FOR A LICENSE TO OPERATE A RECOVERY
RESIDENCE MUST BE SUBMITTED ANNUALLY TO THE BHA IN THE FORM AND
MANNER PRESCRIBED BY THE BHA.
(2) (a) THE BHA SHALL INVESTIGATE AND REVIEW EACH ORIGINAL
APPLICATION AND EACH RENEWAL APPLICATION FOR A LICENSE TO OPERATE
A RECOVERY RESIDENCE. THE BHA SHALL DETERMINE AN APPLICANT'S
COMPLIANCE WITH THIS PART 10 AND THE RULES ADOPTED PURSUANT TO
SECTION 27-50-1002 BEFORE THE BHA ISSUES A LICENSE.
(b) THE BHA SHALL INSPECT THE APPLICANT'S FACILITY AS IT DEEMS
NECESSARY TO ENSURE THE HEALTH, SAFETY, AND WELFARE OF THE
RECOVERY RESIDENTS ARE PROTECTED. THE RECOVERY RESIDENCE SHALL
SUBMIT IN WRITING, IN A FORM PRESCRIBED BY THE BHA, A PLAN DETAILING
THE MEASURES THAT THE RECOVERY RESIDENCE WILL TAKE TO CORRECT
VIOLATIONS FOUND BY THE BHA AS A RESULT OF INSPECTIONS UNDERTAKEN
PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (2).
(c) UPON APPROVAL OF AN APPLICATION FOR A LICENSE, THE
APPLICANT SHALL PROVIDE NOTICE TO THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT THAT
REGULATES ZONING AND LAND USE FOR THE JURISDICTION WHERE THE
RECOVERY RESIDENCE WILL BE LOCATED. THE NOTICE MUST INCLUDE:
(I) A STATEMENT OF THE APPLICANT'S INTENT TO OPERATE A
RECOVERY RESIDENCE UPON ISSUANCE OF A RECOVERY RESIDENCE LICENSE
BY THE BHA;
(II) THE LOCATION OF THE RECOVERY RESIDENCE; AND
(III) THE CONTACT INFORMATION FOR THE APPROPRIATE INDIVIDUAL
WHO CAN BE REACHED TO ADDRESS QUESTIONS AND CONCERNS ABOUT THE
RECOVERY RESIDENCE.
(3) THE BHA SHALL KEEP ALL HEALTH-CARE INFORMATION OR
DOCUMENTS OBTAINED DURING AN INSPECTION OR INVESTIGATION OF A
RECOVERY RESIDENCE PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION
CONFIDENTIAL. RECORDS, INFORMATION, OR DOCUMENTS OBTAINED ARE
EXEMPT FROM DISCLOSURE PURSUANT TO SECTIONS 24-72-204 AND
PAGE 10-SENATE BILL 26-113

27-50-510.
(4) (a) AFTER SUBMITTING AN APPLICATION FOR A LICENSE TO
OPERATE A RECOVERY RESIDENCE, OR WITHIN TEN DAYS AFTER A CHANGE
IN OWNERSHIP OR MANAGEMENT OF A RECOVERY RESIDENCE, EACH
APPLICANT OR OWNER AND MANAGER SHALL SUBMIT TO A
FINGERPRINT-BASED CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD CHECK. THE APPLICANT OR
OWNER AND MANAGER MUST PAY THE COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH THE
FINGERPRINT-BASED CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD CHECK.
(b) AFTER SUBMITTING AN APPLICATION FOR A LICENSE OR WITHIN
TEN DAYS AFTER A CHANGE IN OWNERSHIP OR MANAGEMENT, THE
APPLICANT OR OWNER AND MANAGER SHALL HAVE THE APPLICANT'S OR
OWNER'S AND MANAGER'S FINGERPRINTS TAKEN BY A LOCAL LAW
ENFORCEMENT AGENCY, OR ANY THIRD PARTY APPROVED BY THE COLORADO
BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION FOR THE PURPOSE OF OBTAINING A
FINGERPRINT-BASED CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD CHECK. THE APPLICANT OR
OWNER AND MANAGER SHALL AUTHORIZE THE ENTITY TAKING THE
APPLICANT'S OR OWNER'S AND MANAGER'S FINGERPRINTS TO SUBMIT, AND
THE ENTITY SHALL SUBMIT, THE COMPLETE SET OF THE APPLICANT'S OR
OWNER'S AND MANAGER'S FINGERPRINTS TO THE COLORADO BUREAU OF
INVESTIGATION FOR THE PURPOSE OF CONDUCTING A FINGERPRINT-BASED
CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD CHECK.
(c) IF AN APPROVED THIRD PARTY TAKES THE APPLICANT'S OR
OWNER'S AND MANAGER'S FINGERPRINTS, THE FINGERPRINTS MAY BE
ELECTRONICALLY CAPTURED USING COLORADO BUREAU OF
INVESTIGATION-APPROVED LIVESCAN EQUIPMENT. THIRD-PARTY VENDORS
SHALL NOT KEEP THE APPLICANT'S OR OWNER'S AND MANAGER'S
INFORMATION FOR MORE THAN THIRTY DAYS.
(d) THE COLORADO BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION SHALL USE THE
APPLICANT'S OR OWNER'S AND MANAGER'S FINGERPRINTS TO CONDUCT A
CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD CHECK USING THE BUREAU'S RECORDS. THE
COLORADO BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION SHALL ALSO FORWARD THE
FINGERPRINTS TO THE FEDERAL BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION FOR THE
PURPOSE OF CONDUCTING A FINGERPRINT-BASED CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD
CHECK. THE COLORADO BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION, APPLICANT OR OWNER
AND MANAGER, BHA, AND THE ENTITY TAKING FINGERPRINTS SHALL
COMPLY WITH THE FEDERAL BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION'S REQUIREMENTS TO
PAGE 11-SENATE BILL 26-113

CONDUCT A CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD CHECK.
(e) THE COLORADO BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION SHALL RETURN THE
RESULTS OF ITS CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD CHECK TO THE BHA, AND THE
BHA IS AUTHORIZED TO RECEIVE THE RESULTS OF THE FEDERAL BUREAU OF
INVESTIGATION'S CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD CHECK.
(f) THE BHA SHALL EVALUATE INFORMATION RECEIVED FROM THE
CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD CHECK IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 24-5-101
AND SUBSECTION (5) OF THIS SECTION AND SHALL ONLY DENY AN
APPLICATION BASED ON INFORMATION OBTAINED FROM THE CRIMINAL
HISTORY RECORD CHECK IF THE DENIAL IS WARRANTED PURSUANT TO
SECTION 24-5-101 AND SUBSECTION (5) OF THIS SECTION.
(g) THE BHA SHALL KEEP ANY INFORMATION OBTAINED PURSUANT
TO THIS SUBSECTION (4) CONFIDENTIAL.
(5) (a) AS USED IN THIS SUBSECTION (5), "DIRECTLY RELATED TO"
MEANS THAT THE CRIMINAL OFFENSE FOR WHICH AN APPLICANT HAS BEEN
CONVICTED IS STILL RELEVANT AT THE TIME OF THE APPLICATION FOR A
LICENSE AND WOULD CREATE AN UNREASONABLE RISK TO PUBLIC SAFETY
BECAUSE THE OFFENSE DIRECTLY RELATES TO THE DUTIES AND
RESPONSIBILITIES OF THE OPERATION OF A RECOVERY RESIDENCE, AS
DETERMINED BY BHA AFTER CONSIDERATION OF ALL EVIDENCE AVAILABLE
TO THE BHA.
(b) IF AN APPLICANT HAS BEEN CONVICTED OF A CRIME, THE BHA
MAY ONLY CONSIDER THE APPLICANT'S CONVICTION FOR A THREE-YEAR
PERIOD BEGINNING ON THE DATE OF CONVICTION OR THE END OF
INCARCERATION, WHICHEVER DATE IS LATER, IF THE APPLICANT HAS NOT
BEEN CONVICTED OF ANY OTHER CRIMINAL OFFENSE DURING THE
THREE-YEAR PERIOD. AFTER THE THREE-YEAR PERIOD, THE BHA SHALL
ONLY CONSIDER THE INDIVIDUAL'S APPLICATION FOR LICENSURE IN THE SAME
MANNER AS AN APPLICANT WHO DOES NOT POSSESS A PRIOR CRIMINAL
HISTORY RECORD; EXCEPT THAT THE BHA MAY CONSIDER A CONVICTION
FOR A CRIME THAT IS DIRECTLY RELATED TO THE OPERATION OF A RECOVERY
RESIDENCE.
(c) IF THE BHA IS CONSIDERING AN APPLICANT'S CRIMINAL HISTORY
RECORD DURING THE APPLICATION PROCESS FOR LICENSURE, THE BHA MAY
PAGE 12-SENATE BILL 26-113

ONLY DENY OR REFUSE TO ISSUE OR RENEW THE LICENSE BASED ON THE
INFORMATION IN THE CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD IF THE BHA DETERMINES
THAT THE APPLICANT HAS NOT BEEN REHABILITATED AND IS UNABLE TO
PERFORM THE DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES OF THE OWNERSHIP OR
MANAGEMENT OF A RECOVERY RESIDENCE WITHOUT CREATING AN
UNREASONABLE RISK TO PUBLIC SAFETY.
(d) AN APPLICANT'S CONVICTION FOR A CRIME DOES NOT, IN AND OF
ITSELF, DISQUALIFY THE APPLICANT FROM BEING ISSUED A LICENSE TO
OPERATE A RECOVERY RESIDENCE.
(e) (I) AN APPLICANT OR POTENTIAL APPLICANT WHOSE CONVICTION
MAY AFFECT THEIR APPLICATION FOR LICENSURE MAY PETITION THE BHA AT
ANY TIME, INCLUDING PRIOR TO SUBMITTING AN APPLICATION, FOR A
DECISION AS TO WHETHER THE BHA IS PERMITTED TO CONSIDER THE
APPLICANT'S CONVICTION WHEN REVIEWING THE APPLICATION FOR
LICENSURE.
(II) IF THE BHA DETERMINES THAT THE BHA IS PERMITTED TO
CONSIDER AN APPLICANT'S OR POTENTIAL APPLICANT'S CONVICTION, THE
BHA SHALL ADVISE THE APPLICANT OR POTENTIAL APPLICANT OF ANY
ACTIONS THE APPLICANT OR POTENTIAL APPLICANT MAY TAKE TO REMEDY
THE POTENTIAL EFFECT OF THE CONVICTION. IF A REMEDIAL ACTION IS
ADVISED BY THE BHA, THE APPLICANT MAY SUBMIT A REVISED PETITION ON
OR BEFORE A DATE DETERMINED BY THE BHA FOR COMPLETION OF THE
REMEDIAL ACTION.
(III) IF THE BHA MAKES AN INITIAL DETERMINATION FOR A
POTENTIAL APPLICANT PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (5)(e), THE BHA
MAY REQUIRE A NEW DETERMINATION AT THE TIME AN INDIVIDUAL
FORMALLY APPLIES FOR LICENSURE.
(f) AN APPLICANT WHO PETITIONS THE BHA MUST INCLUDE IN THE
PETITION ANY ADDITIONAL INFORMATION ABOUT THE APPLICANT'S CURRENT
CIRCUMSTANCES, INCLUDING THE TIME SINCE THE CRIMINAL OFFENSE WAS
COMMITTED AND THE SENTENCE WAS COMPLETED, THE APPLICANT'S AGE AT
THE TIME THE OFFENSE WAS COMMITTED, THE PAYMENT OF ANY
COURT-ORDERED RESTITUTION, EVIDENCE OF THE APPLICANT'S
REHABILITATION, TESTIMONIALS, AND THE APPLICANT'S EMPLOYMENT
HISTORY AND EMPLOYMENT ASPIRATIONS.
PAGE 13-SENATE BILL 26-113

(g) (I) IN ORDER TO DENY AN APPLICATION FOR LICENSURE
PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION BASED ON THE INFORMATION IN AN APPLICANT'S
CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD, THE BHA HAS THE BURDEN TO PROVE BY CLEAR
AND CONVINCING EVIDENCE THAT THE DENIAL IS DIRECTLY RELATED TO
INFORMATION IN THE APPLICANT'S CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD AS IT
PERTAINS TO POTENTIAL PERFORMANCE IN, AND THE POTENTIAL CREATION
OF, AN UNREASONABLE RISK TO PUBLIC SAFETY THROUGH THE OPERATION
OR MANAGEMENT OF A RECOVERY RESIDENCE FOR WHICH THE APPLICANT IS
APPLYING FOR LICENSURE.
(II) IF AN INDIVIDUAL FILES A PETITION FOR A DETERMINATION
PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (5), RECEIVES NOTICE OF AN AGENCY
ADJUDICATORY HEARING, FILES AN ANSWER TO THE NOTICE PURSUANT TO
SECTION 24-4-105 (2)(b), AND FAILS TO APPEAR AT THE SCHEDULED TIME
AND PLACE OF THE HEARING, THE ADMINISTRATIVE LAW JUDGE SHALL ENTER
A DEFAULT JUDGMENT IN FAVOR OF THE BHA.
(h) THIS SUBSECTION (5) DOES NOT:
(I) NEGATE ANY PROVISION FOR LICENSURE IN THIS TITLE 27 THAT
REQUIRES AN APPLICANT TO SUBMIT INFORMATION REGARDING THE
APPLICANT'S CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD TO THE BHA WITH AN
APPLICATION;
(II) NEGATE ANY OTHER REASON SPECIFIED IN THIS TITLE 27 FOR
WHICH THE BHA MAY DENY AN APPLICANT LICENSURE;
(III) NEGATE ANY REQUIREMENT UNDER FEDERAL LAW THAT
REQUIRES AN INDIVIDUAL TO OBTAIN OR MAINTAIN A LICENSE; OR
(IV) NEGATE THE LIST OF DETERMINING FACTORS THAT MUST NOT
BE CONSIDERED REGARDING AN APPLICANT'S CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD
PURSUANT TO SECTION 24-5-101 (2)(b).
(6) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (7) OF THIS
SECTION, THE BHA SHALL ISSUE OR RENEW A LICENSE TO OPERATE A
RECOVERY RESIDENCE WHEN THE BHA IS SATISFIED THAT THE APPLICANT
OR LICENSEE IS IN COMPLIANCE WITH THE REQUIREMENTS SET FORTH IN THIS
PART 10 AND THE RULES ADOPTED PURSUANT TO SECTION 27-50-1002.
EXCEPT FOR PROVISIONAL LICENSES ISSUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH
PAGE 14-SENATE BILL 26-113

SUBSECTION (7) OF THIS SECTION, A LICENSE ISSUED OR RENEWED PURSUANT
TO THIS SECTION EXPIRES ONE YEAR AFTER THE DATE OF ISSUANCE OR
RENEWAL.
(7) (a) THE BHA MAY ISSUE A PROVISIONAL LICENSE TO OPERATE A
RECOVERY RESIDENCE TO AN APPLICANT FOR THE PURPOSE OF OPERATING A
RECOVERY RESIDENCE FOR A PERIOD OF NINETY DAYS IF THE APPLICANT IS
TEMPORARILY UNABLE TO CONFORM TO ALL OF THE MINIMUM STANDARDS
REQUIRED, AND THE RULES ADOPTED, PURSUANT TO THIS PART 10; EXCEPT
THAT THE BHA SHALL NOT ISSUE A PROVISIONAL LICENSE TO AN APPLICANT
IF THE OPERATION OF THE RECOVERY RESIDENCE WILL ADVERSELY AFFECT
THE HEALTH, SAFETY, OR WELFARE OF THE RECOVERY RESIDENTS.
(b) AS A CONDITION OF OBTAINING A PROVISIONAL LICENSE, THE
APPLICANT SHALL PROVIDE EVIDENCE TO THE BHA THAT ATTEMPTS ARE
BEING MADE TO CONFORM AND COMPLY WITH THE APPLICABLE STANDARDS
REQUIRED, AND RULES ADOPTED, PURSUANT TO THIS PART 10.
(c) THE BHA SHALL NOT ISSUE A PROVISIONAL LICENSE PRIOR TO
THE COMPLETION OF A CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD CHECK IN ACCORDANCE
WITH SUBSECTION (4) OF THIS SECTION.
(d) THE BHA MAY ISSUE A SECOND PROVISIONAL LICENSE TO EFFECT
COMPLIANCE. THE BHA SHALL NOT ISSUE A THIRD OR SUBSEQUENT
PROVISIONAL LICENSE TO AN APPLICANT IN A YEAR.
27-50-1004. Fees - rules.
(1) (a) NO LATER THAN MAY 1, 2027, THE BHA SHALL ADOPT RULES
ESTABLISHING A SCHEDULE OF LICENSE APPLICATION FEES, INCLUDING
RENEWAL APPLICATION FEES, SUFFICIENT TO MEET THE DIRECT AND INDIRECT
COSTS OF ADMINISTRATION AND ENFORCEMENT OF THIS PART 10.
(b) THE BHA SHALL ASSESS AND COLLECT, FROM RECOVERY
RESIDENCES SUBJECT TO LICENSURE PURSUANT TO SECTION 27-50-1001,
FEES IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE FEE SCHEDULE ESTABLISHED PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (1)(a) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) THE BHA SHALL TRANSMIT FEES COLLECTED PURSUANT TO THIS
SECTION TO THE STATE TREASURER, WHO SHALL CREDIT THE MONEY TO THE
PAGE 15-SENATE BILL 26-113

BEHAVIORAL HEALTH LICENSING CASH FUND CREATED PURSUANT TO
SECTION 27-50-506.
(3) BEHAVIORAL HEALTH ADMINISTRATION FUNCTIONS RELATED TO
THE LICENSING OF RECOVERY RESIDENCES PURSUANT TO THIS PART 10 MUST
BE ENTIRELY FUNDED WITH THE FEES COLLECTED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION
(1) OF THIS SECTION.
27-50-1005. Denial, suspension, or revocation of license -
restrictions - fines.
(1) (a) WHEN THE BHA DENIES AN APPLICATION FOR AN INITIAL
LICENSE TO OPERATE A RECOVERY RESIDENCE PURSUANT TO SECTION
27-50-1003, THE BHA SHALL NOTIFY THE APPLICANT IN WRITING BY
MAILING A NOTICE TO THE ADDRESS SHOWN ON THE APPLICATION. AN
APPLICANT AGGRIEVED BY A DENIAL MAY PURSUE A REVIEW AS PROVIDED
IN ARTICLE 4 OF TITLE 24 AND THE BHA SHALL FOLLOW THE PROCEDURES
SPECIFIED IN ARTICLE 4 OF TITLE 24.
(b) THE BHA MAY DENY AN APPLICATION IF THE APPLICANT, AN
AFFILIATE OF THE APPLICANT, A PERSON EMPLOYED BY THE APPLICANT, OR
A PERSON WHO RESIDES WITH THE APPLICANT IS THE SUBJECT OF, OR HAS
PREVIOUSLY BEEN THE SUBJECT OF, A NEGATIVE LICENSING ACTION OR
CERTIFICATION WITHDRAWAL OR TERMINATION.
(2) (a) THE BHA MAY SUSPEND, REVOKE, OR REFUSE TO RENEW THE
LICENSE OF A RECOVERY RESIDENCE THAT IS OUT OF COMPLIANCE WITH THE
REQUIREMENTS OF, OR RULES ADOPTED PURSUANT TO, THIS PART 10.
SUSPENSION, REVOCATION, OR REFUSAL MUST NOT OCCUR UNTIL AFTER A
HEARING AND IN COMPLIANCE WITH THE PROVISIONS AND PROCEDURES
SPECIFIED IN ARTICLE 4 OF TITLE 24; EXCEPT THAT THE BHA MAY
SUMMARILY SUSPEND A RECOVERY RESIDENCE'S LICENSE BEFORE A HEARING
IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 24-4-104 (4)(a).
(b) AFTER CONDUCTING A HEARING IN ACCORDANCE WITH ARTICLE
4 OF TITLE 24, THE BHA MAY REVOKE OR REFUSE TO RENEW A RECOVERY
RESIDENCE'S LICENSE IF THE OWNER OR ADMINISTRATOR OF THE RECOVERY
RESIDENCE HAS BEEN CONVICTED OF A FELONY OR MISDEMEANOR
INVOLVING CONDUCT THAT THE BHA DETERMINES COULD POSE A RISK TO
THE HEALTH, SAFETY, OR WELFARE OF THE RECOVERY RESIDENTS.
PAGE 16-SENATE BILL 26-113

(3) THE BHA MAY IMPOSE INTERMEDIATE RESTRICTIONS OR
CONDITIONS ON A RECOVERY RESIDENCE THAT MAY INCLUDE AT LEAST ONE
OF THE FOLLOWING:
(a) RETAINING A CONSULTANT TO ADDRESS CORRECTIVE MEASURES;
(b) MONITORING BY THE BHA FOR A SPECIFIC PERIOD;
(c) PROVIDING ADDITIONAL TRAINING TO EMPLOYEES, OWNERS, OR
OPERATORS OF THE RECOVERY RESIDENCE;
(d) COMPLYING WITH A DIRECTED WRITTEN PLAN TO CORRECT THE
VIOLATION; OR
(e) PAYING A CIVIL FINE IN LIEU OF SUSPENSION, REVOCATION,
REFUSAL, OR ANY OTHER ADVERSE LICENSING ACTION, WHICH FINE MUST
NOT EXCEED TWO THOUSAND DOLLARS IN A CALENDAR YEAR. THE BHA
SHALL TRANSMIT MONEY RECEIVED PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (3)(e)
TO THE STATE TREASURER, WHO SHALL CREDIT THE MONEY TO THE GENERAL
FUND.
27-50-1006. Report of occurrences - investigations - rules -
definition.
(1) EACH RECOVERY RESIDENCE SHALL REPORT TO THE BHA ALL OF
THE FOLLOWING OCCURRENCES:
(a) ANY OCCURRENCE THAT RESULTS IN THE DEATH OF A RECOVERY
RESIDENT OF A RECOVERY RESIDENCE AND IS REQUIRED TO BE REPORTED TO
THE CORONER PURSUANT TO SECTION 30-10-606 AS ARISING FROM AN
UNEXPLAINED CAUSE OR UNDER SUSPICIOUS CIRCUMSTANCES;
(b) ANY OCCURRENCE THAT RESULTS IN ANY OF THE FOLLOWING
SERIOUS INJURIES TO A RECOVERY RESIDENT:
(I) BRAIN OR SPINAL CORD INJURIES; OR
(II) SECOND- OR THIRD-DEGREE BURNS INVOLVING TWENTY PERCENT
OR MORE OF THE BODY SURFACE AREA OF AN ADULT RECOVERY RESIDENT OR
FIFTEEN PERCENT OR MORE OF THE BODY SURFACE AREA OF A CHILD
PAGE 17-SENATE BILL 26-113

RESIDING IN THE RECOVERY RESIDENCE;
(c) ANY OCCURRENCE INVOLVING PHYSICAL, SEXUAL, OR VERBAL
ABUSE OF A RECOVERY RESIDENT BY ANOTHER RESIDENT, AN EMPLOYEE OF
THE RECOVERY RESIDENCE, OR A VISITOR, AS DESCRIBED IN SECTION
18-3-202, 18-3-203, 18-3-204, 18-3-206, 18-3-402, 18-3-404, OR 18-3-405;
(d) ANY OCCURRENCE INVOLVING CARETAKER NEGLECT OF A
RECOVERY RESIDENT, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 26-3.1-101 (2.3);
(e) ANY OCCURRENCE INVOLVING MISAPPROPRIATION OF A
RECOVERY RESIDENT'S PROPERTY. AS USED IN THIS SUBSECTION (1)(e),
"MISAPPROPRIATION OF A RECOVERY RESIDENT'S PROPERTY" MEANS A
PATTERN OF OR DELIBERATELY MISPLACING, EXPLOITING, OR WRONGFULLY
USING, EITHER TEMPORARILY OR PERMANENTLY, A RECOVERY RESIDENT'S
BELONGINGS OR MONEY WITHOUT THE RECOVERY RESIDENT'S CONSENT.
(f) ANY OCCURRENCE IN WHICH DRUGS INTENDED FOR USE BY A
RECOVERY RESIDENT ARE DIVERTED FOR USE BY ANOTHER PERSON.
(2) THE STATE BOARD SHALL ADOPT RULES SPECIFYING THE MANNER,
TIME PERIOD, AND FORM IN WHICH THE REPORTS REQUIRED PURSUANT TO
THIS SECTION MUST BE MADE.
(3) A REPORT SUBMITTED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS
SECTION IS STRICTLY CONFIDENTIAL; EXCEPT THAT INFORMATION IN A
REPORT MAY BE TRANSMITTED TO AN APPROPRIATE REGULATORY AGENCY
HAVING JURISDICTION FOR DISCIPLINARY OR LICENSE SANCTIONS. THE
INFORMATION IN THE REPORTS MUST NOT BE MADE PUBLIC UPON SUBPOENA,
SEARCH WARRANT, DISCOVERY PROCEEDINGS, OR OTHERWISE, EXCEPT AS
PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (5) OF THIS SECTION, AND IS EXEMPT FROM
DISCLOSURE PURSUANT TO SECTION 24-72-204.
(4) THE BHA SHALL INVESTIGATE EACH REPORT SUBMITTED
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION THAT THE BHA DETERMINES
WAS APPROPRIATELY SUBMITTED. FOR EACH REPORT INVESTIGATED, THE
BHA SHALL PREPARE A SUMMARY OF ITS FINDINGS, INCLUDING THE BHA'S
CONCLUSIONS AND WHETHER THERE WAS A VIOLATION OF LICENSING
STANDARDS OR A DEFICIENCY AND WHETHER THE RECOVERY RESIDENCE
ACTED APPROPRIATELY IN RESPONSE TO THE OCCURRENCE. IF THE
PAGE 18-SENATE BILL 26-113

INVESTIGATION IS NOT CONDUCTED ON SITE, THE BHA SHALL SPECIFY IN THE
SUMMARY HOW THE INVESTIGATION WAS CONDUCTED. AN INVESTIGATION
CONDUCTED PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (4) IS IN ADDITION TO AND NOT
IN LIEU OF AN INSPECTION REQUIRED TO BE CONDUCTED PURSUANT TO
SECTION 27-50-503 (2) WITH REGARD TO LICENSING.
(5) (a) THE BHA SHALL MAKE THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION
AVAILABLE TO THE PUBLIC:
(I) INVESTIGATION SUMMARIES PREPARED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION
(4) OF THIS SECTION;
(II) COMPLAINTS AGAINST A RECOVERY RESIDENCE THAT HAVE BEEN
FILED WITH THE BHA AND THAT THE BHA HAS INVESTIGATED, INCLUDING
THE CONCLUSIONS REACHED BY THE BHA AND WHETHER THERE WAS A
VIOLATION OF LICENSING OR APPROVAL STANDARDS OR A DEFICIENCY AND
WHETHER THE RECOVERY RESIDENCE ACTED APPROPRIATELY IN RESPONSE
TO THE SUBJECT OF THE COMPLAINT; AND
(III) A LISTING OF DEFICIENCY CITATIONS ISSUED AGAINST EACH
RECOVERY RESIDENCE.
(b) THE INFORMATION RELEASED PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (5)
MUST NOT IDENTIFY THE RECOVERY RESIDENT OR THE HEALTH-CARE
PROFESSIONAL INVOLVED IN THE REPORT.
(6) PRIOR TO THE COMPLETION OF AN INVESTIGATION PURSUANT TO
THIS SECTION, THE BHA MAY RESPOND TO AN INQUIRY REGARDING A
REPORT RECEIVED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION BY
CONFIRMING THAT THE BHA HAS RECEIVED THE REPORT AND THAT AN
INVESTIGATION IS PENDING.
(7) IN ADDITION TO THE REPORT TO THE BHA FOR AN OCCURRENCE
DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (1)(c) OF THIS SECTION, THE OCCURRENCE MUST
BE REPORTED TO A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY.
27-50-1007. Probation placement referrals - judicial updates to
identify eligible entities - legislative declaration - repeal.
(1) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS THAT IMPLEMENTING LICENSING
PAGE 19-SENATE BILL 26-113

REQUIREMENTS PURSUANT TO THIS PART 10 NECESSITATES THAT THE
JUDICIAL DEPARTMENT UPDATE ITS CRITERIA FOR ENTITIES SEEKING
PLACEMENT ON ANY APPROVED LIST USED FOR PROBATION PLACEMENT
REFERRALS.
(2) NO LATER THAN AUGUST 1, 2027, THE JUDICIAL DEPARTMENT
SHALL UPDATE ANY EXISTING REQUEST FOR PROPOSALS, APPROVED VENDOR
LIST, OR SIMILAR PROCUREMENT OR APPROVAL PROCESS USED TO IDENTIFY
ENTITIES ELIGIBLE TO RECEIVE PROBATION PLACEMENT REFERRALS TO
REFLECT THE LICENSURE REQUIREMENTS ESTABLISHED BY THE BHA
PURSUANT TO THIS PART 10.
(3) ONCE THE UPDATES REQUIRED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2) OF
THIS SECTION ARE COMPLETE, THE JUDICIAL DEPARTMENT SHALL ACCEPT
APPLICATIONS FROM RECOVERY RESIDENCES LICENSED BY THE BHA THAT
PROVIDE HOUSING AND RECOVERY SUPPORT SERVICES. AN ELIGIBLE
RECOVERY RESIDENCE MAY APPLY FOR INCLUSION ON THE APPROVED LIST.
(4) A RECOVERY RESIDENCE ADDED TO THE APPROVED LIST MUST
REMAIN ON THE LIST SO LONG AS THE RECOVERY RESIDENCE MEETS THE
UPDATED CRITERIA DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION.
(5) THIS SECTION IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2028.
27-50-1008. Repeal of part - sunset review.
(1) (a) THIS PART 10 IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE SEPTEMBER 1, 2033.
(b) BEFORE ITS REPEAL, THE DEPARTMENT OF REGULATORY
AGENCIES SHALL REVIEW THE REGULATION OF RECOVERY RESIDENCES IN
ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 24-34-104.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-34-104, add
(34)(a)(XV) as follows:
24-34-104. General assembly review of regulatory agencies and
functions for repeal, continuation, or reestablishment - legislative
declaration - repeal.
(34) (a) The following agencies, functions, or both, are scheduled
PAGE 20-SENATE BILL 26-113

for repeal on September 1, 2033:
(XV) THE REGULATION OF RECOVERY RESIDENCES PURSUANT TO
PART 10 OF ARTICLE 50 OF TITLE 27.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 27-50-506 as
follows:
27-50-506. Behavioral health licensing cash fund - creation.
The behavioral health licensing cash fund, referred to in this section
as the "fund", is created in the state treasury. The fund consists of money
credited to the fund pursuant to section 27-50-504 (2). The money in the
fund is subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly for the
direct and indirect costs of the BHA in performing its duties pursuant to this
part 5 AND PART 10 OF THIS ARTICLE 50. At the end of any state fiscal year,
all unexpended and unencumbered money in the fund remains in the fund
and must not be credited or transferred to the general fund or any other
fund.
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 27-80-129, add (13) as
follows:
27-80-129. Regulation of recovery residences - rules - definitions
- repeal.
(13) THIS SECTION IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027.
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 27-50-105, amend
(1)(a); and repeal (1)(ff) as follows:
27-50-105. Administration of behavioral health programs - state
plan - sole mental health authority - gifts, grants, or donations.
(1) The BHA shall administer and provide the following behavioral
health programs and services:
(a) The regulation of recovery residences pursuant to section
27-80-129 PART 10 OF THIS ARTICLE 50;
PAGE 21-SENATE BILL 26-113

(ff) The recovery residence certifying body pursuant to section
27-80-122;
SECTION 7. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 27-80-122, add (3) as
follows:
27-80-122. Recovery residence certifying body - competitive
selection process - appropriation - repeal.
(3) THIS SECTION IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JUNE 30, 2027.
SECTION 8. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 27-80-125, amend (3)
as follows:
27-80-125. Housing assistance for individuals with a substance
use disorder - report - rules - appropriation.
(3) In awarding temporary financial housing assistance in
accordance with this section, the BHA shall consider funding for
individuals entering into a recovery residence, as defined in section
27-80-129 SECTION 27-50-101.
SECTION 9. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 30-28-115, amend
(2)(b.7) as follows:
30-28-115. Public welfare to be promoted - legislative
declaration - construction - definitions.
(2) (b.7) The general assembly finds and declares that it is the policy
of the state to encourage, promote, and assist persons who are in recovery
from substance use disorders to live in residential neighborhoods. Further,
the general assembly declares that the use of recovery residences, as defined
in section 27-80-129 (1)(b) SECTION 27-50-101, by persons in recovery from
substance use disorders is a matter of statewide concern and that recovery
residences are a residential use of property for zoning purposes and subject
only to the regulations of like dwellings in the same zone.
SECTION 10. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 31-23-303, amend
(2)(b.7) as follows:
PAGE 22-SENATE BILL 26-113

31-23-303. Legislative declaration.
(2) (b.7) The general assembly finds and declares that it is the policy
of the state to encourage, promote, and assist persons who are in recovery
from substance use disorders to live in residential neighborhoods. Further,
the general assembly declares that the use of recovery residences, as defined
in section 27-80-129 (1)(b) SECTION 27-50-101, by persons in recovery from
substance use disorders is a matter of statewide concern and that recovery
residences are a residential use of property for zoning purposes and subject
only to the regulations of like dwellings in the same zone.
SECTION 11. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 44-3-108, amend
(2)(b) as follows:
44-3-108. Substance use disorders - recovery - retail liquor sales
- stakeholder group - rules - repeal.
(2) The liquor enforcement division shall convene a stakeholder
group of the following members to develop the rules required in subsection
(1) of this section:
(b) Two individuals representing a recovery residence, as defined
in section 27-80-129 (1)(b) SECTION 27-50-101;
SECTION 12. In Colorado Revised Statutes, repeal 27-80-107.7.
SECTION 13. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
PAGE 23-SENATE BILL 26-113

approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
James Rashad Coleman, Sr. Julie McCluskie
PRESIDENT OF SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
____________________________ ____________________________
Esther van Mourik Vanessa Reilly
SECRETARY OF CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 24-SENATE BILL 26-113